apertium-sqi.sqi.dix
    <pardef n="/yt__det">
      <e><p><l>yt</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tënd</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tënd</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tënd</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>jote</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tënde</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sate</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sate</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>tu</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tu</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>të</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>të</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>tua</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tua</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>të</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>të</l><r>yt<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ynë__det">
      <e><p><l>ynë</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tonë</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tonë</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tonë</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>jonë</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tonë</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sonë</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sonë</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>tanë</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tanë</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tonë</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tonë</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>tona</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tona</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tona</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tona</l><r>ynë<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/juaj__det">
      <e><p><l>juaj</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tuaj</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tuaj</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tuaj</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>juaj</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tuaj</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>suaj</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>suaj</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>tuaj</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tuaj</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tuaj</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tuaj</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>tuaja</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tuaja</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tuaja</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tuaja</l><r>juaj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->

    <pardef n="lul/e__n_f">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eje</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eje</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ja</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esh</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>et</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mal__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esh</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="yt"><i></i><par n="/yt__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ynë"><i></i><par n="/ynë__det"/></e>
    <e lm="juaj"><i></i><par n="/juaj__det"/></e>
    <e lm="gusht"><i>gusht</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ristrukturim"><i>ristrukturim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="abuzim"><i>abuzim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="barazim"><i>barazim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dëgjim"><i>dëgjim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fajësim"><i>fajësim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fajtore"><i>fajtor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="finale"><i>final</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gjeografike"><i>gjeografik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gjest"><i>gjest</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="infektim"><i>infektim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="intensive"><i>intensiv</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="jozyrtare"><i>jozyrtar</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="karburant"><i>karburant</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kineze"><i>kinez</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="konservatore"><i>konservator</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="konsorcium"><i>konsorcium</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="lëshim"><i>lëshim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="logjistike"><i>logjistik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="menjëhershme"><i>menjëhershm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="minoritet"><i>minoritet</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="muzikore"><i>muzikor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="njëanshme"><i>njëanshm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="operim"><i>operim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pakthyeshme"><i>pakthyeshm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="parazgjedhore"><i>parazgjedhor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pëlqim"><i>pëlqim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="përkujtimore"><i>përkujtimor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pritës"><i>pritës</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="problematike"><i>problematik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="reformim"><i>reformim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rome"><i>rom</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sajt"><i>sajt</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sekretare"><i>sekretar</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shkëmbim"><i>shkëmbim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sipërfaqe"><i>sipërfaq</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="stad"><i>stad</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="suedeze"><i>suedez</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="themelim"><i>themelim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="totale"><i>total</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ukrainas"><i>ukrainas</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="verilindore"><i>verilindor</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vrull"><i>vrull</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="anëtare"><i>anëtar</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="as"><i>as</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="britanike"><i>britanik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="departament"><i>departament</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="domosdoshme"><i>domosdoshm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fillestare"><i>fillestar</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fillim"><i>fillim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="historike"><i>historik</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="investim"><i>investim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kufizim"><i>kufizim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kriter"><i>kriter</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kufitare"><i>kufitar</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mjet"><i>mjet</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ndryshme"><i>ndryshm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="parlament"><i>parlament</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="përgjithshme"><i>përgjithshm</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="reale"><i>real</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="referendum"><i>referendum</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tregtare"><i>tregtar</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="udhëtim"><i>udhëtim</i><par n="mal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ministre"><i>ministr</i><par n="lul/e__n_f"/></e>
